Hawaii statutes.
[Part viii.] labor trafficking

[§707-780] Definitions. As used in
this part:

"Deadly force" has the same meaning
as in section 703-300.

"Force" has the same meaning as in
section 703-300.

"Labor" means work of economic or
financial value. Prostitution-related and obscenity-related activities as set
forth in chapter 712 are not forms of "labor" under this part.

"Services" means a relationship
between a person and the actor in which the person performs activities under
the supervision of or for the benefit of the actor or a third party. Prostitution-related
and obscenity-related activities as set forth in chapter 712 are not forms of "services"
under this part.

"Unlawful force" has the same meaning
as in section 703‑300.

"Venture" means a business
relationship between two or more parties to undertake economic activity
together.

"Victim" means the person against
whom an offense specified in section 707-781 or 707-782 has been committed. [L
2011, c 146, pt of §1]

Previous
Vol14_Ch0701-0853
Next